Washington statutes.
RCW 11.102.030

Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall apply to fiduciary relationships in existence on June 11, 1943, or thereafter established.

[ 1985 c 30 s 81. Prior: 1955 c 33 s 30.28.030; prior: 1943 c 55 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 3388-6. Formerly RCW 30.28.030.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.